extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX D   0           iach       [inr]z is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       [loruy]c is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       o[sz] is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       rn is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       [ud][szz] is:locative is:plural
SFX D   0           iach       [^i][ae]z is:locative is:plural
SFX D   d           diach      [eoru]d is:locative is:plural
SFX D   d           diach      [^i]ad is:locative is:plural
SFX D   n           niach      leben is:locative is:plural
SFX D   n           niach      [alou]n is:locative is:plural
SFX D   n           niach      cen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   n           niach      jesen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   n           niach      [^a]len is:locative is:plural
SFX D   n           nach       ien is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      hlben is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      [^e]den is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      iahen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      [^ij][^a]sen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      ven is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      izen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      [^i]aren is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      [^i]eren is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      dren is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          niach      uhen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          nach       eden is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          nach       a[rsl]en is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          nach       iesen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          nach       [ayi]zen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          nach       priazen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          nach       basen is:locative is:plural
SFX D   en          nach       i[ae]ren is:locative is:plural
SFX D   l           liach      [^s][ye][l] is:locative is:plural
SFX D   el          liach      sel is:locative is:plural
SFX D   el          liach      mysel is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ec          ciach      ec is:locative is:plural
SFX D   ec          cami       ec is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   0           ami        d is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   el          lami       sel is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   0           ami        [^s]el is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   en          nami       [bdhrsszv]en is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   en          nami       a[ls]en is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   en          nami       i[aeu].en is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   n           nami       [^a][ls]en is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   n           nami       [^bdhlrsszv]en is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   n           nami       [^e]n is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   0           ami        t is:instrumental is:plural
SFX D   0           ami        [^acdlnt] is:instrumental is:plural

SFX K Y 37
SFX K   d           di         d is:genitive
SFX K   t           ti         t is:genitive
SFX K   n           ni         n is:genitive
SFX K   0           i          [^adtnl] is:genitive
SFX K   0           i          [^adtnl] is:dative
SFX K   t           ti         t is:dative
SFX K   a           ej         a is:dative
SFX K   0           0          . is:accusative
SFX K   a           u          a is:accusative
SFX K   l           li         l is:locative
SFX K   a           ou         a is:instrumental
SFX K   0           ou         [^a] is:instrumental
SFX K   0           i          [^adtnl] is:nominative is:plural
SFX K   t           ti         t is:nominative is:plural
SFX K   a           e          a is:nominative is:plural
SFX K   ina         in         ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   d           di         d is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   l           li         l is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   t           ti         t is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   n           ni         n is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   0           i          [^adtnl] is:genitive is:plural
SFX K   a           am         a is:dative is:plural
SFX K   d           diam       d is:dative is:plural
SFX K   l           liam       l is:dative is:plural
SFX K   t           tiam       t is:dative is:plural
SFX K   n           niam       n is:dative is:plural
SFX K   0           iam        [^adtnl] is:dative is:plural
SFX K   0           i          [^adtnl] is:accusative is:plural
SFX K   t           ti         t is:accusative is:plural
SFX K   a           ach        a is:locative is:plural
SFX K   d           diach      d is:locative is:plural
SFX K   l           liach      l is:locative is:plural
SFX K   t           tiach      t is:locative is:plural
SFX K   n           niach      n is:locative is:plural
SFX K   0           iach       [^adtnl] is:locative is:plural
SFX K   a           ami        a is:instrumental is:plural
SFX K   0           ami        [^a] is:instrumental is:plural
