extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
Kodan/D po:noun is:feminine
Pariz/D po:noun is:feminine
Remes/D po:noun is:feminine
Torun/D po:noun is:feminine
Voronez/D po:noun is:feminine
alegorickost/K po:noun is:feminine
alonz/D po:noun is:feminine
arbitraz/D po:noun is:feminine
asociativnost/K po:noun is:feminine
bagaz/D po:noun is:feminine
baliaren/D po:noun is:feminine
bandaz/D po:noun is:feminine
bedac/D po:noun is:feminine
bezbrehost/K po:noun is:feminine
bezplatnost/K po:noun is:feminine
bezvyslednost/K po:noun is:feminine
bieliaren/D po:noun is:feminine
bodlac/D po:noun is:feminine
bohorovnost/K po:noun is:feminine
byl/D po:noun is:feminine
capatost/K po:noun is:feminine
celust/D po:noun is:feminine
cern/D po:noun is:feminine
chamrad/D po:noun is:feminine
chcenost/K po:noun is:feminine
chrast/D po:noun is:feminine
chytrost/K po:noun is:feminine
ciertaz/D po:noun is:feminine
cudzokrajnost/K po:noun is:feminine
cukraren/D po:noun is:feminine
dekoltaz/D po:noun is:feminine
dekoracnost/K po:noun is:feminine
direktivnost/K po:noun is:feminine
dojivost/K po:noun is:feminine
dolkaren/D po:noun is:feminine
dramatickost/K po:noun is:feminine
drevaren/D po:noun is:feminine
dvojclennost/K po:noun is:feminine
egocentriskost/K po:noun is:feminine
ekvipaz/D po:noun is:feminine
exotickost/K po:noun is:feminine
fajciaren/D po:noun is:feminine
fermez/D po:noun is:feminine
flektivnost/K po:noun is:feminine
frezaren/D po:noun is:feminine
gombikaren/D po:noun is:feminine
gramatickost/K po:noun is:feminine
guraz/D po:noun is:feminine
hladiaren/D po:noun is:feminine
hlbokomyselnost/K po:noun is:feminine
hlinikaren/D po:noun is:feminine
horaren/D po:noun is:feminine
hovorovost/K po:noun is:feminine
hydinaren/D po:noun is:feminine
hygroskopickost/K po:noun is:feminine
inaktivnost/K po:noun is:feminine
intuitivnost/K po:noun is:feminine
jazdiaren/D po:noun is:feminine
jednostajnost/K po:noun is:feminine
kabelaz/D po:noun is:feminine
kaluz/D po:noun is:feminine
karosaren/D po:noun is:feminine
kazen/D po:noun is:feminine
klukatost/K po:noun is:feminine
kolaj/D po:noun is:feminine
kolportaz/D po:noun is:feminine
konecnost/K po:noun is:feminine
korist/K po:noun is:feminine
korkaren/D po:noun is:feminine
kradez/D po:noun is:feminine
krvilacnost/K po:noun is:feminine
kyretaz/D po:noun is:feminine
lakavost/K po:noun is:feminine
lamparen/D po:noun is:feminine
lekaren/D po:noun is:feminine
lisiackost/K po:noun is:feminine
litraz/D po:noun is:feminine
lyziaren/D po:noun is:feminine
malickost/K po:noun is:feminine
masliaren/D po:noun is:feminine
mechanickost/K po:noun is:feminine
menaz/D po:noun is:feminine
milostpani/D po:noun is:feminine
mizernost/K po:noun is:feminine
mlad/D po:noun is:feminine
mokrad/D po:noun is:feminine
monochromatickost/K po:noun is:feminine
mraziaren/D po:noun is:feminine
mystickost/K po:noun is:feminine
nadrz/D po:noun is:feminine
nahost/K po:noun is:feminine
naslednost/K po:noun is:feminine
nastrojaren/D po:noun is:feminine
necudnost/K po:noun is:feminine
nedotiahnutost/K po:noun is:feminine
nekonkretnost/K po:noun is:feminine
nemovitost/K po:noun is:feminine
neodovodnenost/K po:noun is:feminine
nepocuvnost/K po:noun is:feminine
nepremennost/K po:noun is:feminine
nepruznost/K po:noun is:feminine
neslychanost/K po:noun is:feminine
nesympatickost/K po:noun is:feminine
neuvedomelost/K po:noun is:feminine
nevyspytatelnost/K po:noun is:feminine
neznelost/K po:noun is:feminine
niz/D po:noun is:feminine
obdobnost/K po:noun is:feminine
obliekaren/D po:noun is:feminine
obsirnost/K po:noun is:feminine
obycaj/D po:noun is:feminine
odovzdanost/K po:noun is:feminine
odpoved/D po:noun is:feminine
omrzenost/K po:noun is:feminine
osadlost/K po:noun is:feminine
otrepanost/K po:noun is:feminine
palacinkaren/D po:noun is:feminine
papieren/D po:noun is:feminine
past/D po:noun is:feminine
pazravost/K po:noun is:feminine
pecivaren/D po:noun is:feminine
pivaren/D po:noun is:feminine
platnost/KN po:noun is:feminine
plavaren/D po:noun is:feminine
pletiaren/D po:noun is:feminine
plust/D po:noun is:feminine
pochmurnost/K po:noun is:feminine
podobizen/D po:noun is:feminine
podriadenost/K po:noun is:feminine
polnoc/K po:noun is:feminine
popudenost/K po:noun is:feminine
postruhen/D po:noun is:feminine
potupnost/K po:noun is:feminine
poziven/D po:noun is:feminine
pozvolnost/K po:noun is:feminine
prax/D po:noun is:feminine
precibrenost/K po:noun is:feminine
predsien/D po:noun is:feminine
premyslenost/K po:noun is:feminine
prestiz/D po:noun is:feminine
prezieravost/K po:noun is:feminine
priazen/D po:noun is:feminine
prietrz/D po:noun is:feminine
prijemnost/K po:noun is:feminine
problematicnost/K po:noun is:feminine
provokacnost/K po:noun is:feminine
psiaren/D po:noun is:feminine
rec/K po:noun is:feminine
reportaz/D po:noun is:feminine
rigoroznost/K po:noun is:feminine
roven/D po:noun is:feminine
rozdvojenost/K po:noun is:feminine
rozorvanost/K po:noun is:feminine
rozumnost/K po:noun is:feminine
rukovat/D po:noun is:feminine
samopas/D po:noun is:feminine
samorastlost/K po:noun is:feminine
san/D po:noun is:feminine
selektivnost/K po:noun is:feminine
senaz/D po:noun is:feminine
sisatost/K po:noun is:feminine
sklaren/D po:noun is:feminine
skrieplivost/K po:noun is:feminine
slapaj/D po:noun is:feminine
slepost/K po:noun is:feminine
snet/D po:noun is:feminine
solventnost/K po:noun is:feminine
sondaz/D po:noun is:feminine
splnitelnost/KN po:noun is:feminine
spoved/D po:noun is:feminine
spupnost/K po:noun is:feminine
srien/D po:noun is:feminine
staznost/K po:noun is:feminine
stran/D po:noun is:feminine
striezlivost/K po:noun is:feminine
strojaren/D po:noun is:feminine
suchoparnost/K po:noun is:feminine
sukaren/D po:noun is:feminine
sustredenost/K po:noun is:feminine
sutaz/D po:noun is:feminine
svojraznost/K po:noun is:feminine
syparen/D po:noun is:feminine
taravost/K po:noun is:feminine
teliaren/D po:noun is:feminine
tiraz/D po:noun is:feminine
tmavost/K po:noun is:feminine
tokaren/D po:noun is:feminine
treparen/D po:noun is:feminine
trikotaz/D po:noun is:feminine
trojrozmernost/K po:noun is:feminine
tuzkaren/D po:noun is:feminine
ucast/K po:noun is:feminine
uctaren/D po:noun is:feminine
umernost/KN po:noun is:feminine
urastenost/K po:noun is:feminine
uroven/D po:noun is:feminine
ustipacnost/K po:noun is:feminine
uvrat/D po:noun is:feminine
uzavretost/K po:noun is:feminine
vec/K po:noun is:feminine
vernisaz/D po:noun is:feminine
viackolajnost/K po:noun is:feminine
visaz/D po:noun is:feminine
vodaren/D po:noun is:feminine
vodotesnost/K po:noun is:feminine
vybavenost/K po:noun is:feminine
vymedzenost/K po:noun is:feminine
vypln/D po:noun is:feminine
vysinutost/K po:noun is:feminine
vyzbroj/D po:noun is:feminine
vzajomnost/K po:noun is:feminine
zadumcivost/K po:noun is:feminine
zamlknutost/K po:noun is:feminine
zasluzilost/K po:noun is:feminine
zasobaren/D po:noun is:feminine
zbehlost/K po:noun is:feminine
zehliaren/D po:noun is:feminine
zemezlc/D po:noun is:feminine
zhubnost/K po:noun is:feminine
zjemnenost/K po:noun is:feminine
zlatobyl/D po:noun is:feminine
zmrzlinaren/D po:noun is:feminine
znamenitost/K po:noun is:feminine
zrohovatenost/K po:noun is:feminine
